Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1307
Damaged real property; legislative findings and declarations; terms, defined.

(1) The Legislature finds and declares that fires, earthquakes, floods, tornadoes, and other events causing significant property damage occur with enough frequency in this state that provision should be made to grant property tax relief to owners of real property adversely affected by such events.

(2) For purposes of sections 77-1307 to 77-1309:

(a) Damaged real property means real property that suffers significant property damage on or after January 1 and before July 1 of the current assessment year. Damaged real property does not include property suffering significant property damage that is caused by the owner of the property; and

(b) Significant property damage means:

(i) Damage to an improvement exceeding twenty percent of the improvement's assessed value in the current tax year; or

(ii) Damage to land exceeding twenty percent of the land's assessed value in the current tax year.

Laws 2019, LB512, § 15;

Laws 2025, LB501, § 2.

A fire started by arson is a "calamity" under subsection (2)(a) of this section because that definition includes all disastrous events and is not limited to only natural events. Inland Ins. Co. v. Lancaster Cty. Bd. of Equal., 316 Neb. 143, 3 N.W.3d 354 (2024).